Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.160

Normal school permanent fund.

There shall be in the state treasury a permanent fund known as the "normal school permanent fund," into which shall be paid all moneys derived from the sale of lands set apart by the enabling act or otherwise for state normal schools.

[ 2007 c 215 s 9; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.160.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Contingent effective date—2007 c 215: See notes following RCW 39.42.070.